Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1404
Municipal heat, light, and ice plants; management; rates; service.

When any such utility shall have been established, the municipality shall provide by ordinance for the management thereof, the rates to be charged, and the manner of payment for service or for the product.

Laws 1919, c. 181, § 4, p. 405;

C.S.1922, § 4399;

C.S.1929, § 18-104;

R.S.1943, § 19-1404.

The duty of a city to fix reasonable rates for electricity furnished to consumers through a municipal lighting plant is not violated by a contract to purchase necessary equipment for it and to pay a portion of the purchase price out of its net earnings, where contract provided that such earnings should be based alone on lawful charges. Carr v. Fenstermacher, 119 Neb. 172, 228 N.W. 114 (1929).